Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Dealer Contracts

§ 63-17-131.
Filing and approval of dealer contracts.

Any person, partnership, association of persons or corporation engaged in the manufacture and/or distribution of motor vehicles, whether resident or nonresident of the State of Mississippi, transacting the business of manufacturing, distribution, or sale of motor vehicles or the parts or accessories thereof in the State of Mississippi, shall file in the Office of the Secretary of State the form of a contract which is to be entered into between such manufacturer with its agent, dealer or representative in this state. Upon the approval by the Attorney General of the contract, the contract shall become binding on all parties thereto. The failure to file the contract with the Secretary of State as provided herein and to secure the approval thereof of the Attorney General of the state, shall render the contract unenforceable. This section shall not apply to dealers or manufacturers of motor homes governed by the provisions of Sections 63-17-201 through 63-17-221.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8072; Laws, 1935, ch. 35; Laws, 2014, ch. 532, § 14, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2014.

§ 63-17-133.
Liquidation of damages for breach of contract by arbitration.

In the event of a breach of the contract referred to in Section 63-17-131, the party injured or damaged by such breach may have recourse for the liquidation of his damages to a board of arbitration and award as provided in Chapter 15, Title 11, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8072; Laws, 1935, ch. 35.

§ 63-17-135.
Maintenance of civil action for actual damages for breach of contract.

Any person, partnership, association of persons, or corporation damaged by the breach of the contract referred to in Section 63-17-131, and desiring to take an appeal as provided by Chapter 15, Title 11, Mississippi Code of 1972, from the findings of the board of arbitration and award may in each instance of such injury or damage recover all actual damages sustained in addition to the penalties provided in Section 63-17-137 and may maintain its, or his, action against one or more of the parties to said contract, its officers or agents.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8073; Laws, 1935, ch. 35.

§ 63-17-137.
Applicability of provisions; penalties for violations.

Sections 63-17-131 through 63-17-137 shall not affect any contract existing as of October 2, 1935, between any person, partnership, association of persons or corporation acting as the agent, dealer or representative of any motor vehicle manufacturer, nor shall they affect the relationship of any parties now acting as the agent, dealer or representative of any manufacturer without contract in this state. If any motor vehicle manufacturer should, after said date, without good cause or without tendering reimbursement for the damage or injury sustained by its agent, dealer or representative, cancel the existing contract or should without good cause refuse to continue the business relationship existing between manufacturer and agent, dealer or representative without contract the dealer, agent or representative so injured by the loss of his or its dealership, agency or representation may sue and recover all actual damages sustained by him, it or them. For a violation of the provisions of Sections 63-17-131 through 63-17-139 a domestic corporation shall forfeit its charter and a foreign corporation shall forfeit its right to do business in this state and shall also forfeit not less than $500.00 nor more than $1,000.00 to the State of Mississippi and shall be proceeded against by the attorney general in the manner and form as provided for a quo warranto proceeding or injunction under the laws of this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8074; Laws, 1935, ch. 35.

§ 63-17-139.
Proof of damages.

In any action taken, proof by the party plaintiff that he has been compelled to discontinue the relationship of manufacturer, agent, dealer or representative on account of the unlawful act or breach of said contract by the party defendant or that the party defendant has threatened to cancel said contract without good cause and without first having submitted the question for an adjustment of a breach of said contract to a board of arbitration and award, shall be conclusive evidence of damage, and in every case proof of any unlawful purpose or agreement to violate the terms of said contract, shall entitle the party injured thereby to all actual damage sustained by him and shall in addition thereto subject the party violating said contract to the penalty provided in Section 63-17-137.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8075; Laws, 1935, ch. 35.

§ 63-17-141.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2014, ch. 349, § 5, effective July 1, 2014.

§63-17-141. [Laws, 1994, ch. 399, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 395, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.]